Tennessee, session 114, SB0033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as "MaKayla's Law."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-103, is amended by adding
the following new subdivision (b)(5) and redesignating the existing subdivision (b)(5)
accordingly:
(5) Reckless endangerment committed by a person when the person fails to
lock, secure, or otherwise store or make unavailable a firearm and ammunition for the
firearm is:
(A) A Class E felony if a child younger than thirteen (13) years of age
obtains possession of the firearm, discharges the firearm, and the discharge
results in bodily injury or serious bodily injury to the child or to another; or
(B) A Class C felony if a child younger than thirteen (13) years of age
obtains possession of the firearm, discharges the firearm, and the discharge
results in the death of the child or another.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0033
000537
- 1 -